California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
-------------------------------------------

999.10.

(a) An awarding department taking bids in connection with the award of a contract shall provide, in the general conditions under which bids will be received, that a person making a bid or offer to perform a contract shall, in the bid or offer, set forth the following information:

(1) The name, disabled veteran business enterprise certification number, contact information, and the location of the place of business of each subcontractor certified as a disabled veteran business enterprise who will perform work or labor or render service to the prime contractor in connection with the performance of the contract and who will be used by the prime contractor
 to fulfill disabled veteran business enterprise participation goals.

(2) The portion of work that will be done by each subcontractor under paragraph (1). Except in cases of emergency when a contract is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare, or safety, or protection of state property, the prime contractor shall list only one subcontractor for each portion of work as is defined by the prime contractor in the contractor’s bid or offer.

(3) A certification, signed under penalty of perjury, that the portion of work that will be done by each subcontractor under paragraph (1) serves a commercially useful function, as defined in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 999.

(b) The Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code) shall apply to the information required by subdivision (a) relating to subcontractors certified as disabled veteran business enterprises.

(c) For purposes of this section, “subcontractor” and “prime contractor” shall have the same meaning as those terms are defined in Section 4113 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) As used in this section, “contract” does not include a contract negotiated pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 756, Sec. 15.   (AB 1574)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

999.11.

The Secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs shall appoint the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program Advocate. The California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program Advocate shall report directly to the secretary and shall do all of the following:

(a) Promote implementation of the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program.

(b) Support and facilitate the activities of administering agencies and existing and potential disabled veteran business enterprises to achieve the goals specified in Sections 999.1 and 999.2, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) Assisting awarding departments in identifying certified disabled veteran business enterprises that can offer their services for contracts that contract procurement staff have difficulty identifying.

(2) Assisting disabled veteran business enterprises in effectively utilizing certification documents and the state electronic procurement system in identifying which products and services businesses have on offer.

(c) Coordinate with the agency Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program Advocate appointed in all awarding departments pursuant to Section 999.12.

(d) Establish a method of monitoring adherence to the goals specified in Sections 999.1 and
 999.2.

(e) Establish and promote a system to track the effectiveness of promotional activities undertaken by state agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 124.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

999.12.

Each awarding department shall appoint an agency Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program Advocate. This person shall be the same individual appointed pursuant to Section 14846 of the Government Code. The agency Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program Advocate shall do all of the following:

(a) Assist certified disabled veteran business enterprises in participating in that agency’s contracting process.

(b) Assist contract officers in seeking disabled veteran business enterprises to participate in the agency’s contract and procurement opportunities by performing outreach efforts to recruit
 certified
 disabled veteran business enterprises to offer their services as either a prime contractor or subcontractor on any contract proposed by the awarding department that requires disabled veteran business enterprise participation, and by other feasible means.

(c) Meet regularly with the contract and procurement staffs of their departments to disseminate information about the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program, learn of future contracting opportunities, and identify the types of goods, services, and information technology contracts for which the contract and procurement staff is having or anticipates having difficulty in identifying potential certified disabled veteran business enterprise contractors or subcontractors.

(d) Serve as an advocate for the disabled
 veteran business enterprises that are utilized as the agency’s contractors or subcontractors.

(e) Report to the Office of Small Business and Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Services regarding any violation of this article.

(f) Coordinate and meet, on a regular basis, with the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program Advocate at the Department of Veterans Affairs in an effort to meet the statewide 3-percent goal provided for in Section 999.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 756, Sec. 17.   (AB 1574)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

999.13.

This article includes language similar to that contained in Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 10115) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and does not create an independent or additional goal or program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 999.12 by Stats. 2001, Ch. 666, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Contracts with Nonprofit Veteran Service Agencies [999.50. - 999.51.]

999.50.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to encourage state agencies, cities, counties, districts, and other political subdivisions to purchase goods manufactured by, and services provided by, a nonprofit veteran service agency whenever it is both feasible to do so and the location of the nonprofit veteran service agency makes the purchases reasonably convenient.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

999.51.

(a) A nonprofit veteran service agency shall be eligible for certification as a small business under the Small Business Procurement and Contract Act, as described in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 14835) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and may be granted a small business bid preference if it meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The goods or services meet the specifications and needs of the purchasing agency.

(2) The goods or services are purchased at a fair and reasonable price, as determined by the appropriate state or local agency.

(3) The nonprofit veteran service agency complies with all of the following requirements:

(A) The nonprofit veteran service agency shall employ veterans receiving services from the nonprofit veteran service agency for not less than 75 percent of the person-hours of direct labor required for the production of goods and the provision of services performed pursuant to a contract under this section.

(B) The nonprofit veteran service agency agrees to make those elections permitted of any nonprofit corporation under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act (26 U.S.C. Sec. 3103 et seq.) and the Unemployment Insurance Code in order to
 provide social security and unemployment and disability benefits for its employees, commencing with its first contract or purchase order under this section and continuing thereafter. In the event that the nonprofit veteran service agency ceases to provide those benefits, any existing contract or purchase order under this section with the nonprofit veteran service agency is terminated and no further contracts or purchase orders shall be awarded to that nonprofit veteran service agency for the period of two years after the nonprofit veteran service agency ceases to provide the benefits.

(C) The nonprofit veteran service agency does not commit any unfair labor practices, as defined in the National Labor Relations Act, at Section 158 of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(D) The nonprofit veteran service agency abides by the provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938
 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq.), the Walsh-Healy Public Contract Act (41 U.S.C. Sec. 35 et seq.), and the regulations of the Department of Industrial Relations (8 Cal. Code Regs. 1 et seq.).

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Nonprofit veteran service agency” means a community-based organization that meets the following requirements:

(A) It is exempt from tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) Its principal purpose is to provide housing, substance abuse, case management, and employment training services for low-income veterans, disabled veterans, or homeless veterans and their families.

(2) “Direct labor” includes all work required for preparation, processing, and
 packing of a good, or work directly relating to the performance of a service, excluding supervision, administration, inspection, and shipping.

(3) A veteran receiving services from the nonprofit veteran service agency shall be considered an employee when performing productive work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.2. Veterans Services Funding [999.80. - 999.80.]

999.80.

Any entity, or other entity with which it subcontracts, that receives funding from the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (WIA) (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2801 et seq.), as identified in Item 7100-001-0869, schedule (4) 61.60 - WIA Removing Barriers for Special Needs Populations, identified for use for veterans, of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2009 (Chapter 1 of the Statutes of the 2009 Third Extraordinary Session), and future budget acts, shall meet the following criteria:

(a) Demonstrate the
 knowledge, experience, and capacity to provide desired services to veterans.

(b) Demonstrate that the majority of the entity’s WIA resources are dedicated to serving the needs of veterans and their families.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 26.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Veterans’ Revenue Debenture Act of 1970 [1000.1. - 1006.16.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1000.1. - 1000.3.]

1000.1.

This chapter may be cited as the Veterans’ Revenue Debenture Act of 1970.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.2.

The following terms, wherever used or referred to in this chapter, shall have the following meanings, respectively, unless a different meaning appears from the context:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Veterans Affairs of the State of California, as the same is constituted by the provisions of Section 63 of this code, and any successor to that office.

(b) “Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee” means the committee constituted pursuant to the provisions of Section 1000.3 of this code.

(c) “Debenture” means any written evidence of any obligation issued by the department pursuant to this chapter for the financing of programs of the department, or for the refinancing of obligations issued by the department or by the state for those programs, payment of which is secured by a pledge of revenues, as provided in this chapter, irrespective of the form of the obligation.

(d) “Debenture holder” means any person who shall be the bearer of any outstanding debenture registered to bearer not registered, or the registered owner of any outstanding debenture which shall at the time be registered other than to bearer.

(e) “Veteran” shall have the meaning set forth in Section 980 of this code.

(f) “Pledged contracts” means contracts of sale entered into by the department and veterans covering any property purchased or acquired by the department from the proceeds of debentures as may be provided in any resolution of issuance and to the extent therein provided.

(g) “Surplus money” means funds not required to meet any immediate demand which has accrued against the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 without regard to fiscal years.

(h) “Revenues” means all income and receipts of the department from the pledged contracts, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all payments received in account of the selling price, interest thereon, expenses and all other charges added to the selling price, insurance proceeds collected on account of loss, damage or injury to the property, life insurance or disability insurance proceeds received by the department, and all other receipts of whatsoever kind or nature arising out of or incident to the pledged contracts.

The term “revenues” also includes all interest or other income from any investment of any moneys in any fund established under a resolution of issuance for the payment of the principal of, or interest or premium on, debentures.

(i) “Resolution of issuance” means a resolution of the department, approved by the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, pursuant to which debentures are issued, and any amendatory or supplemental resolutions.

(j) “Person” means any individual, firm, corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, trust, business trust, or receiver or trustee or conservator for any thereof, but does not include this state or any public corporation, political subdivision, city, county, district or agency of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 530, Sec. 5.   Effective September 17, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.3.

There is hereby created a Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee composed of the Governor, the State Controller, the State Treasurer, the Director of Finance, and the Director of Veterans Affairs, each of whom shall serve thereon without compensation and a majority of whom shall be empowered to act for such committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Authorization and Issuance of Debentures [1001.1. - 1001.9.]

1001.1.

Debentures may be issued by the department at such times and in such amounts not to exceed five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) in the aggregate as the department, with the approval of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, may determine. The issuance of debentures shall be authorized by a resolution of issuance adopted as in this chapter provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.2.

Whenever the department determines that debentures should be issued, it shall adopt a resolution of issuance, which shall be executed for the department by the Director of Veterans Affairs. Each resolution of issuance so adopted by the department shall be submitted to the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, which shall consider and approve or disapprove any resolution of issuance so submitted. Upon such approval, by a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, the resolution of issuance shall become effective and the State Treasurer shall cause the debentures authorized thereunder to be prepared in accordance with the terms of the resolution of issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.3.

Debentures shall be issued in the name of the Department of Veterans Affairs of the State of California and as the obligation of the department, but neither the principal of, nor the interest on, any debentures shall be or become a lien, charge or liability against the State of California, the department or the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, or against the property or funds of any of them, except to the extent of the pledge of revenues as may be provided by the resolution of issuance pursuant to which such debentures are issued. Every debenture shall contain a recital substantially as follows: “This debenture is a special obligation of the Department of Veterans Affairs of the State of California, and is not a lien, charge or liability against the State of California, or against the Department of Veterans Affairs or against the property or funds of either, except only to the extent of the pledge of revenues or part of revenues as provided in the resolution. The holder of this debenture cannot compel the exercise of the taxing power of the State of California or the forfeiture of its property to pay this debenture or the interest thereon.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.4.

All debentures shall bear the facsimile signature of the Director of Veterans Affairs and the Deputy Director of Veterans Affairs and shall be authenticated by the trustee. The seal of the Department of Veterans Affairs shall be impressed, mechanically reproduced or imprinted by facsimile upon each debenture. The interest coupons attached to any debenture shall bear a facsimile of the signature of the Director of Veterans Affairs. In case any such official whose signature or countersignature appears on the debentures or coupons shall cease to be such official before the debentures so signed or countersigned shall have been actually executed or delivered, such signature or countersignature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the debentures, and such debentures and coupons shall be issued and shall be as binding upon the department as though the person who signed such debentures or coupons had been such official on the date borne by the debentures or coupons and on the date of delivery. Any such debentures may be signed and sealed on behalf of the department by such person as at the actual date of execution of such debentures shall be the Director of Veterans Affairs or the Deputy Director of Veterans Affairs, as the case may be, although on such date as may be borne by such debentures any such person shall not have been such official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.5.

The validity of the authorization and issuance of any debentures shall not be dependent on or affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the expenditure of the proceeds thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.6.

Reference on the face of any debentures to a resolution of issuance by its date of adoption, or the apparent date on the face thereof, shall be sufficient to incorporate all of the provisions thereof and of this chapter into the body of the debentures and their appurtenant coupons. Each taker and subsequent holder of the debentures or coupons, whether the coupons are attached to or detached from the debentures, shall have recourse to all of the provisions of the resolution of issuance and of this chapter, and shall be bound thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.7.

In addition to the debentures authorized by Section 1001.1, the department may issue additional debentures not to exceed five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) in the aggregate, at such times and in such amounts as the department, with the approval of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, may determine. The issuance of such debentures shall be authorized by a resolution of issuance adopted as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.8.

In addition to the debentures authorized by Sections 1001.1 and 1001.7, the department may issue additional debentures, not to exceed five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) in the aggregate, at the times and in the amounts that the department, with the approval of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, may determine. The issuance of these debentures shall be authorized by a resolution of issuance adopted as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 414, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.9.

In addition to the debentures authorized by Sections 1001.1, 1001.7, and 1001.8, the department may issue additional debentures at any time pursuant to this chapter if the total amount of debentures outstanding at any time does not exceed the total amount of debentures authorized by this article.

Debentures which are refunded pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 1004.1), or for which money or securities sufficient to pay the principal, interest, and any redemption premium thereon have been deposited in any reserve fund or in trust, are not debentures which are outstanding within the meaning of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 414, Sec. 2.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Provisions of Resolutions of Issuance and Supplemental Resolutions [1002.1. - 1002.28.]

1002.1.

A resolution of issuance may provide for the issuance of debentures in one or more series and for the aggregate principal amount of any series thereof. Any series of debentures may consist of serial debentures or of term debentures with sinking fund requirements or partially of serial debentures and partially of term debentures with sinking fund requirements. For any authorized issuance of debentures, the resolution may provide the department with the discretion to determine the number of series to be issued, the aggregate principal amount of each series, the designation of debentures within any such series as serial or term debentures, and the mandatory sinking account payments for term debentures, if any, subject to the aggregate principal amount of debentures authorized in the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 287, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.2.

A resolution of issuance may provide for the dates to be borne by debentures, and by each series, issued thereunder and for the dates of maturity thereof. For any authorized issuance of debentures, the resolution may provide the department with discretion to determine the dates of the debentures and maturity dates of the debentures, subject to the maximum maturity date authorized in the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 287, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.3.

A resolution of issuance may provide for date or dates for the payment of interest on debentures and the interest rate or rates, fixed or variable, or the method of determining such rate or rates. For any authorized issuance of debentures, the resolution may provide the department with discretion to determine the interest rates and payment dates, subject to the maximum rate of interest and the method of determination authorized in the resolution. The first interest payment may be at any time on or before one year from the date of the debenture. The resolution may also provide the department with discretion to obtain credit enhancement or liquidity support for the authorized debentures and to determine the form of any such agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.4.

A resolution of issuance may provide for the call and redemption of debentures issued thereunder, upon such terms, conditions and notice, and upon the payment of such premium, as may be fixed in said resolution. For any authorized issuance of debentures, the resolution may provide the department with discretion to determine the prices, terms and conditions for redemption, and the amount of premium, if any, not to exceed the maximum amount authorized in the resolution. No debenture shall be subject to call or redemption prior to its fixed maturity date unless the right to exercise such call is expressly stated on the face of the debenture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 287, Sec. 4.   Effective September 25, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.5.

A resolution of issuance may provide for the forms, denominations, registration, transfer and interchange of debentures issued thereunder. Debentures may be issued as coupon debentures or as registered debentures in any denomination or denominations authorized by the resolution of issuance. A resolution of issuance may provide for the interchange of coupon debentures for registered debentures and of registered debentures for coupon debentures, and may provide for the registration of coupon debentures as to principal only or as to both principal and interest. Debentures of different denominations, in either coupon or registered form, may be made exchangeable for debentures of an equal aggregate principal amount, but of different denominations upon such terms as may be provided in the resolution of issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.6.

A resolution of issuance may provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated debentures or coupons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.7.

A resolution of issuance may provide for the issuance of temporary or interim debentures, certificates or receipts pending the preparation and delivery of definitive debentures. Such temporary or interim debentures, certificates or receipts may be of any denomination and with or without coupons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.8.

A resolution of issuance may provide for the payment of the principal and interest of debentures at any place within or without the State of California and in specified coin or currency of the United States and may include a covenant to maintain, in each city in which any outstanding debentures shall be expressed to be payable, an office or agency where such debentures and interest coupons thereon may be presented for payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.9.

A resolution of issuance shall provide the means by which payments of principal and interest of debentures shall be secured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.10.

A resolution of issuance may include a provision requiring the department to pay or cause to be paid punctually the principal of all debentures issued thereunder and the interest thereon, on the dates, at the places and in the manner provided in such debentures and in the coupons appertaining thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.11.

A resolution of issuance may include a provision requiring the department to preserve and protect the security of the debentures and the rights of the holders thereof and to warrant and defend such rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.12.

A resolution of issuance may include provisions which limit, restrict or prohibit any right, power or privilege of the department to create or give any mortgage, lien or pledge on any personal or real property acquired by the department out of moneys in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1970, or upon the pledged contracts or upon any other revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.13.

A resolution of issuance may include provisions requiring, specifying or limiting the kind, amount and character of insurance to be maintained by the department on any property under the jurisdiction of the department and the use and disposition of the proceeds of any such insurance thereafter collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.14.

A resolution of issuance may include a provision requiring the department to charge a uniform rate of interest on the unpaid balance of the purchase price of any and all properties acquired by the department and sold to veterans under this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.15.

A resolution of issuance may include provisions requiring the department to hold or cause to be held in trust the revenues, or any part of the revenues, pledged to the payment of debentures and the interest thereon, and to apply or cause to be applied revenues or such part of revenues, only as provided in the resolution of issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.16.

A resolution of issuance may include provisions defining the power of the department in applying the proceeds of the sale of any debentures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.17.

A resolution of issuance may include a provision authorizing, or limiting the power of, the department to issue additional debentures and establishing the terms and conditions upon which additional debentures may be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.18.

A resolution of issuance may include a clause providing the events of default and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the debentures then or thereafter issued may become or be declared due and payable prior to maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.19.

A resolution of issuance may include provisions establishing the rights, powers and duties arising upon breach by the department of any of the covenants, conditions or obligations contained therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.20.

A resolution of issuance may include provisions prescribing a procedure by which the terms and conditions of the resolution may be subsequently amended or modified with the consent of the department and the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee and the vote or written consent of the holders of a specified principal amount or specified proportion of the debentures issued and outstanding. Such provisions may include provisions for meetings of debenture holders and for the manner in which the consent of the debenture holders may be given. A resolution of issuance may provide that debentures held by the department or by the State of California or any political subdivision, public corporation or agency thereof shall not be counted as outstanding debentures or be entitled to vote or consent, but shall nevertheless be subject to any such modification or amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.21.

A resolution of issuance may provide that the debentures issued thereunder and the interest thereon shall be secured by all or part of the revenues, and may establish a lien upon the revenues as the department, with the approval of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, shall determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.22.

A resolution of issuance may include a covenant that the department will duly pay and discharge, or cause to be paid and discharged, any taxes, assessments or other governmental charges lawfully imposed upon any properties owned by or under the jurisdiction of the department, or upon the revenues, as well as any lawful claim for labor, materials or supplies which, if unpaid, might become a lien or charge upon the revenues, or which might impair the security of the debentures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.23.

A resolution of issuance may include provisions requiring the preparation, filing and publication of financial statements with respect to the revenues, the funds securing the debentures and the expenses, properties and operations of the department, including provisions for examinations and reports by independent certified public accountants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.24.

A resolution of issuance may include a covenant that the department will at all times use its best efforts to maintain the powers, functions, duties and obligations reposed in it pursuant to law at the time of adoption of such resolution, and that it will not at any time voluntarily do, suffer or permit any act or thing, the effect of which would be to hinder, delay or imperil the payment of the indebtedness evidenced by any of the debentures or the performance or observance of any of the covenants contained in such resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.25.

A resolution of issuance may include provisions requiring, permitting, restricting or governing the deposit and investment of funds established for the security of debentures issued thereunder, and requiring that such deposits be secured or specifying the type of security required for such deposits irrespective of any law authorizing or permitting such deposit or investment of public funds generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.26.

A resolution of issuance may include a covenant that the department will make or adopt and execute, or cause to be made, adopted and executed, any and all such further resolutions, acts, deeds, conveyances, assignments or assurances as may be reasonably required for effectuating the intention of the resolution of issuance and for better assuring and confirming unto the holders of the debentures the rights and benefits provided in the resolution of issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.27.

A resolution of issuance may include any and all covenants and agreements on the part of the department, and for such other acts or matters which the department, subject to the approval of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, deems necessary or convenient or advisable for the better security of the debentures issued thereunder or to make the debentures more marketable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.28.

The State Treasurer shall act as trustee for the department and the holders of its bonds, to receive and disburse all the revenues applicable to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds, including any reserve fund, sinking fund or other fund established for the further securing of the bonds. The department may provide in any resolution of issuance for the appointment of a trustee, other than the State Treasurer, to represent and enforce rights of holders of bonds of the department if, and in the manner and under conditions, provided in the resolution authorizing the bonds, such trustee shall be a bank or trust company duly qualified to do business in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Appropriation, Security, Sale, and Funds [1003.1. - 1003.16.]

1003.1.

There is hereby appropriated, from any surplus money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not required to meet any immediate demand which has accrued against the fund, without regard to fiscal years, the sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or so much thereof as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article, but in no event shall the sum be less than 10 percent of the total amount of all debentures outstanding hereunder. Such sum appropriated shall be held in investments which are convertible into cash within the period of time required to satisfy the current requirements of the Veterans’ Debenture Revenue Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.2.

The revenues shall be pledged first to the payment of the principal of and interest on the debentures and to all funds created for the further security of such debentures. In addition there shall be pledged to the payment of such principal and interest and all other charges, including reserve fund, sinking fund and all other payments required to be made in connection with the debentures, as further security therefor, such portions of the funds appropriated in Section 1003.1 as the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee shall deem necessary to adequately protect the rights of the debenture holders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.3.

In the event of cancellation of any pledged contract or forfeiture or other termination thereof for any cause the department shall, as soon as practicable, enter into a new contract covering the same or similar property and shall substitute the new contract in lieu of the pledged contract so canceled or terminated. The income and receipts of the substituted contract shall be pledged in their entirety to the payment of the debentures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.4.

The department shall at all times, so long as any of the debentures are outstanding, establish, fix, and collect interest at the rate or rates, which may be fixed interest rates or variable interest rates, on the unpaid balance on all pledged contracts to produce an amount that, together with income derived from investments, will yield revenues that will, in the aggregate, be sufficient with respect to the then immediately ensuing fiscal year to pay and provide for all of the following:

(a) Interest to become due and payable in that fiscal year on all debentures.

(b) The principal amount of all serial debentures maturing by their terms during that fiscal year.

(c) The aggregate minimum sinking fund payments, if any, required to be made for that fiscal year on account of debentures then outstanding.

(d) Those sums as may be required as reserve fund payments due in that fiscal year.

(e) The estimated expenses of maintenance, operation, and administration of the department as provided in the budget of the department for that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 530, Sec. 6.   Effective September 17, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.6.

All interest and other payments or charges of any kind or character due under any and all such contracts shall be payable in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for the payment of public and private debts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.7.
